Utah statutes.
53A-1-907.   Legislative review and approval of federal education
agreements.
(1) (a)  Before legally binding the state by executing a federal education
agreement that may cost education entities more than $1,000,000 annually from
state and local monies to implement, the school official shall:
(i)  submit the proposed federal education agreement to the governor for the
governor's approval or rejection as required by Section 53A-1-906; and
(ii)  if the governor approves the federal education agreement, submit the
federal education agreement to the Executive Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature for its review and recommendations.
(b)  The Executive Appropriations Committee shall review the federal education
agreement and may:
(i)  recommend that the school official execute the federal education
agreement;
(ii)  recommend that the school official reject the federal education
agreement; or
(iii)  recommend to the governor that the governor call a special session of
the Legislature to review and approve or reject the federal education
agreement.
(2) (a)  Before legally binding the state by executing a federal education
agreement that may cost education entities more than $5,000,000 annually to
implement, a school official shall:
(i)  submit the proposed federal education agreement to the governor for the
governor's approval or rejection as required by Section 53A-1-906; and
(ii)  if the governor approves the federal education agreement, submit the
federal education agreement to the Legislature for its approval in an annual
general session or a special session.
(b) (i)  If the Legislature approves the federal education agreement, the
school official may execute the agreement.
(ii)  If the Legislature rejects the federal education agreement, the school
official may not execute the agreement.
(c)  If a school official executes a federal education agreement without
obtaining the Legislature's approval under this Subsection (2):
(i)  the governor may issue an executive order declaring the federal education
agreement void; or
(ii)  the Legislature may pass a joint resolution declaring the federal
education agreement void.
